Utah statutes.
67-21-2.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Adverse action" means to discharge, threaten, or otherwise discriminate against an employee in any manner that affects the employee's employment, including compensation, terms, conditions, location, rights, immunities, promotions, or privileges.

(2)  "Communicate" means a verbal, written, broadcast, or other communicated report.

(3)  "Employee" means a person who performs a service for wages or other remuneration under a contract of hire, written or oral, express or implied.

(4) (a)  "Employer" means the employing state agency or political subdivision of the state.

(b)  "Employer" includes an agent of an employer.

(5)  "Public body" means any of the following:

(a)  a state officer, employee, agency, department, division, bureau, board, commission, council, authority, educational institution, or any other body in the executive branch of state government;

(b)  an agency, board, commission, council, institution member, or employee of the legislative branch of state government;

(c)  a county, city, town, regional governing body, council, school district, local district, special service district, or municipal corporation, board, department, commission, council, agency, or any member or employee of them;

(d)  any other body that is created by state or local authority, or that is primarily funded by or through state or local authority, or any member or employee of that body;

(e)  a law enforcement agency or any member or employee of a law enforcement agency; and

(f)  the judiciary and any member or employee of the judiciary.



Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

